Missouri, session 2026, HB3280.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 301, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 301.4102, to read as follows:
301.4102. 1. Any person who is a surviving spouse of person who qualified for
disabled veteran license plates under this chapter may apply for "Surviving Spouse"
motor vehicle license plates for any motor vehicle such person owns, either solely or
jointly, other than an apportioned motor vehicle or a commercial motor vehicle licensed
in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds gross weight.
2. Any such person shall make application for the surviving spouse license plates
on a form provided by the director of revenue and shall furnish such proof of status as a
surviving spouse as the director may require. The director shall then issue license plates
bearing letters or numbers or a combination thereof as determined by the director with
the words "SURVIVING SPOUSE" in place of the words "SHOW-ME STATE". The
words "OF DISABLED VETERAN" shall appear on the bottom of such license plates.
Such license plates shall be made with fully reflective material with a common color
scheme and design, shall be clearly visible at night, and shall be aesthetically attractive,
as prescribed by section 301.130.
3. There shall be a fifteen dollar fee in addition to the regular registration fees
charged for each set of surviving spouse license plates issued pursuant to this section. A
fee for the issuance of personalized license plates pursuant to section 301.144 shall not
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3280 2
be required for plates issued under this section. There shall be no limit on the number
of license plates any person qualified pursuant to this section may obtain so long as each
set of license plates issued pursuant to this section is issued for vehicles owned solely or
jointly by such person. License plates issued pursuant to the provisions of this section
shall not be transferable to any other person except that any registered co-owner of the
motor vehicle shall be entitled to operate the motor vehicle with such plates for the
duration of the year licensed in the event of the death of the qualified person.
✔